Nebraska, session 109, LB1077.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1077 LB1077
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-146.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
48-146.03 (1) Each workers' compensation insurance policy issued by
an insurer pursuant to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act:
(a) Shall offer, at the option of the insured employer, a deductible
for medical benefits in the amount of five hundred dollars to two
thousand five hundred dollars per claim in increments of five hundred
dollars; or
(b) May offer, at the option of the insured employer and the
workers' compensation insurer, a deductible for all amounts paid by the
insurer as long as the deductible is not more than forty percent of the
insured employer's otherwise applicable annual workers' compensation
insurance premium at rates approved for the insurer but not less than
fifty thousand dollars.
The insured employer, if choosing to exercise one of such options
listed in this subsection, may choose only one of the amounts as the
deductible. The provisions of this section shall be fully disclosed to
each prospective purchaser in writing.
(2) The deductible form shall provide that the workers' compensation
insurer shall remain liable for and shall pay the entire cost of medical
benefits for each claim directly to the medical provider, shall remain
liable for and pay the entire cost of benefits, claims, and expenses as
required by the policy irrespective of the deductible provision, and
shall then be reimbursed by the employer for any deductible amounts paid
by the workers' compensation insurer. The employer shall be liable for
reimbursement up to the limit of the deductible.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2027, losses paid by the employer under the
deductible shall be credited against the employer's experience
modification while the deductible option is used, unless the employer
elects to purchase a gross reportable deductible policy.
(4) (3) A workers' compensation insurer shall not be required to
-2-

LB1077 LB1077
2026 2026
offer a deductible if, as a result of a credit investigation, the insurer
determines that the employer does not have the financial ability to be
responsible for the payment of deductible amounts.
(5) (4) A workers' compensation insurer shall service and, if
necessary, defend all claims that arise during the policy period,
including those claims payable in whole or in part from the deductible
amount, and shall make such reports to the compensation court of payments
made, including payments made under the deductible provisions, as may be
required by the compensation court.
(6) (5) A person who is employed by a policyholder which chooses to
exercise the option of a deductible policy shall not be required to pay
any of the deductible amount, and any such policyholder shall not require
or attempt to require the employee to give up his or her right of
selection of physician set out in section 48-120. Any violation of this
subsection shall be a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-146.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-